Illinois, session 104th, SB3877.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 524-8.2 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/24-8.2 new)7    Sec. 24-8.2. Continuing education coursework used for 8salary increases.9    (a) For purposes of this Section:10    "Continuing education coursework" means any graduate-level 11course completed by a licensed educator for the purpose of 12salary advancement, a salary lane change, or other 13compensation-related advancement under a collective bargaining 14agreement, school board policy, or salary schedule.15    "Graduate-level, degree-eligible credit" means academic 16credit documented on an official academic transcript by a 17regionally accredited institution of higher education that may 18be applied toward a master's degree, education specialist 19degree, or doctoral degree.20    "Instructor of record" means an individual assigned 21responsibility for academic oversight of a course, including 22instruction, evaluation and feedback of participant work, and 23the assignment of grades.  SB3877- 2 -LRB104 18470 LNS 31912 b1    "Salary lane change" means the receiving of a pay increase 2on a salary schedule by earning additional academic credits. 3    (b) Beginning with continuing education coursework 4commenced on or after July 1, 2026, a school district, special 5education cooperative, or other public educational employer 6may recognize continuing education coursework for purposes of 7salary advancement or salary lane changes only if the 8continuing education coursework meets all of the following 9requirements:10        (1) The continuing education coursework is 11    graduate-level, degree-eligible credit offered by a 12    regionally accredited institution of higher education and 13    documented on an official academic transcript.14        (2) The continuing education coursework results in a 15    letter grade issued by the institution of higher 16    education. Coursework graded solely on a pass or fail, 17    satisfactory or unsatisfactory, or completion basis is not 18    eligible.19        (3) The continuing education coursework includes an 20    instructor of record who:21            (A) is a credentialed educator holding a master's 22        degree or higher and is academically qualified to 23        teach the continuing education course, with 24        demonstrated experience in the content area or areas 25        of the continuing education course;26            (B) provides substantive instructional support to   SB3877- 3 -LRB104 18470 LNS 31912 b1        the participating educator throughout the period of 2        continuing education course enrollment; and3            (C) evaluates participant work and provides 4        individualized, written feedback aligned to continuing 5        education course objectives.6    (c) Nothing in this Section impairs the ability of the 7parties to a collective bargaining agreement to negotiate 8salary schedules or compensation structures, as long as any 9continuing education coursework recognized for salary 10advancement or salary lane changes complies with the 11requirements of this Section.12    (d) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 13Board of Higher Education, may adopt rules as necessary to 14implement this Section, including standards for documentation, 15transcript verification, institutional accreditation, and 16compliance monitoring. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182026.